Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 2. Fees.

§ 13.1-815.
Fees to be collected by Commission; payment of fees prerequisite to Commission action; exceptions.

The Commission shall assess the registration fees and shall charge and collect the filing fees, charter fees and entrance fees imposed by law. The Commission shall have authority to certify to the Comptroller directing refund of any overpayment of a fee, or of any fee collected for a document that is not accepted for filing, at any time within one year from the date of its payment. When the Commission receives payment of an annual registration fee assessed against a domestic or foreign corporation, such payment shall be applied against any unpaid annual registration fees previously assessed against such corporation, including any penalties incurred thereon, beginning with the assessment or penalty that has remained unpaid for the longest period of time.

The Commission shall not file or issue with respect to any domestic or foreign corporation any document or certificate specified in this chapter, except the annual report required by §

13.1-936

, a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-834

or

13.1-926

, and a statement of resignation pursuant to §

13.1-835

or

13.1-927

, until all fees, charges, fines, penalties, and interest assessed, imposed, charged, or to be collected by the Commission pursuant to this chapter or Title 12.1 have been paid by or on behalf of such corporation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Commission may file or issue any document or certificate with respect to a domestic or foreign corporation that has been assessed an annual registration fee if the document or certificate is filed or issued with an effective date that is on or before the due date of the corporation’s annual registration payment in any year, provided that the Commission shall not issue a certificate of domestication with respect to a foreign corporation or a certificate of entity conversion with respect to a domestic corporation that will become a domestic eligible entity until the annual registration fee has been paid by or on behalf of that corporation.

A domestic or foreign corporation shall not be required to pay the annual registration fee assessed against it pursuant to subsection B of §

13.1-936.1

in any year if (i) the Commission issues or files any of the following types of certificate or instrument and (ii) the certificate or instrument is effective on or before the annual registration fee due date:

A certificate of termination of corporate existence or a certificate of incorporation surrender for a domestic corporation;

A certificate of withdrawal for a foreign corporation;

A certificate of merger or an authenticated copy of an instrument of merger for a domestic or foreign corporation that has merged into a surviving domestic corporation or eligible entity, or into a surviving foreign corporation or eligible entity; or

An authenticated copy of an instrument of entity conversion for a foreign corporation that has converted to a different entity type.The Commission shall cancel the annual registration fee assessments specified in this subsection that remain unpaid.

Annual registration fee assessments that have been paid shall not be refunded.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-284; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 1988, c. 405; 1989, c. 152; 1997, c. 216; 2003, c. 374; 2006, c. 659; 2007, cc. 810, 925; 2009, c. 216; 2010, c. 753; 2015, c. 623; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 3 provides: “That until July 1, 2023, the term ‘incorporation surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, the term ‘organization surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, and the term ‘trust surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘domestication,’ and the term ‘entity conversion’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10, 12, or 14 of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘conversion.’ ”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 1997 amendment,

effective January 1, 1998, substituted “its annual report due date pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-936

” for “March 15” in the first and second sentences of the last paragraph.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 374 inserted “or certificate of incorporation surrender” in the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 659 rewrote the first paragraph of subsection B and substituted “canceling” for “cancelling” in the third sentence of the last paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 810, in subsection B, substituted “on or before” for “prior to” and added the proviso at the end of the second sentence and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Except as hereinafter provided, the issuance of a certificate of termination of corporate existence pursuant to §

13.1-913

shall not have the effect of releasing any obligation that has accrued in favor of this Commonwealth on account of such assessment”; inserted the subsection C and D designations; and in subsection C, substituted “on or before” for “prior to” in the first and second sentences and rewrote the third sentence.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the filing fees, charter fees” for “filing fees, the charter fees” in subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “Act” for “the chapter” twice; inserted the subsection C and D designations; in subsection C, inserted “in the Commonwealth” in the first sentence and substituted “specified in this subsection that remain” for “above specified remaining” in the last sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 216 substituted “an authenticated copy of the instrument of merger” for “the certificate of merger” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 753, in subsection A, added the last sentence and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 rewrote subsection C, which read “Any domestic corporation that has ceased to exist in the Commonwealth because of the issuance of a certificate of termination of corporate existence or certificate of incorporation surrender or any foreign corporation that has obtained a certificate of withdrawal, effective on or before its annual report due date pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-936

in any year, shall not be required to pay the registration fee for that year. Any domestic or foreign corporation that has merged, effective on or before its annual report due date pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-936

in any year, into a surviving domestic corporation or into a surviving foreign corporation that files with the Commission an authenticated copy of the instrument of merger on or before such date, shall not be required to pay the registration fee for that year. The Commission shall cancel the registration fee assessments specified in this subsection that remain unpaid.”; and substituted “Annual registration” for “Registration” in subsection D.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection B, substituted “chapter” for “Act” twice and inserted “or a certificate of entity conversion with respect to a domestic corporation that will become a domestic eligible entity”; deleted “or a certificate of entity conversion” in subdivision C 1; and made stylistic changes. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-815.1.
Charter and entrance fees for corporations.

Every domestic corporation, upon the granting of its charter or upon domestication, shall pay a charter fee in the amount of $50 into the state treasury, and every foreign corporation shall pay an entrance fee of $50 into the state treasury for its certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

For any foreign corporation that files articles of domestication and that had authority to transact business in the Commonwealth at the time of such filing, the charter fee to be charged upon domestication shall be an amount equal to the difference between the amount that would be required by this section and the amount already paid as an entrance fee by such corporation.

For any domestic stock corporation that files articles of conversion to become a domestic corporation, the charter fee to be charged shall be an amount equal to the difference between the amount already paid as a charter fee by the domestic stock corporation and the amount that would be required by this section to be paid.

History.

1988, c. 405; 2003, c. 374; 2007, cc. 810, 925; 2008, c. 509; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 374 added the subsection A designation; substituted “$50” for “fifty dollar” in two places in subsection A; and added subsection B.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 810 rewrote subsection A, which formerly read: “Every domestic corporation, upon the granting of its charter, shall pay a $50 fee into the state treasury, and every foreign corporation without capital stock shall pay $50 into the state treasury for its certificate of authority to conduct its affairs in this Commonwealth”; and in subsection B, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in the first sentence and deleted the second sentence, which formerly read: “If no charter or entrance fee has been heretofore paid to this Commonwealth, the amount to be paid shall be the same as would have to be paid on original incorporation or application for authority to transact business.”

The 2007 amendment by c. 925, in subsection A, inserted “or upon domestication” and deleted “without capital stock” preceding “shall pay $50” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 509 added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, deleted the last sentence of subsection B, which read: “For any foreign corporation that files an application for a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth and that had previously surrendered its articles of incorporation as a domestic corporation, the entrance fee to be charged upon obtaining a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth shall be an amount equal to the difference between the amount that would be required by this section and the amount already paid as a charter fee by such corporation”; and added subsection C. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-816.
Fees for filing documents or issuing certificates.

The Commission shall charge and collect the following fees, except as provided in §

12.1-21.2

:

For the filing of articles of entity conversion to convert a corporation to a limited liability company, the fee shall be $100.

For filing any one of the following, the fee shall be $25:

Articles of incorporation, domestication, or incorporation surrender.

Articles of amendment or restatement.

Articles of merger.

Articles of correction.

An application of a foreign corporation for a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

An application of a foreign corporation for an amended certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

A copy of an amendment to the articles of incorporation of a foreign corporation holding a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

A copy of articles of merger of a foreign corporation holding a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

A copy of an instrument of entity conversion of a foreign corporation holding a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

An application to register or to renew the registration of a corporate name.

For filing any one of the following, the fee shall be $10:

For issuing a certificate pursuant to §

13.1-945

, the fee shall be $6.

a.

An application to reserve or to renew the reservation of a corporate name.

b.

A notice of transfer of a reserved corporate name.

c.

An application for use of an indistinguishable name.

d.

Articles of dissolution.

e.

Articles of revocation of dissolution.

f.

Articles of termination of corporate existence.

g.

An application for withdrawal of a foreign corporation.

h.

A notice of release of a registered name.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-285, 13.1-286.1; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1964, c. 551; 1972, c. 579; 1975, c. 500; 1981, c. 522; 1982, c. 460; 1984, c. 294; 1985, c. 522; 1987, c. 183; 1988, c. 405; 1995, c. 368; 2003, c. 374; 2004, c. 274; 2007, cc. 771, 925; 2012, c. 130; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 3 provides: “That until July 1, 2023, the term ‘incorporation surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, the term ‘organization surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, and the term ‘trust surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘domestication,’ and the term ‘entity conversion’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10, 12, or 14 of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘conversion.’ ”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 374 redesignated former subdivisions A to C as present subdivisions 1 to 3, redesignated former paragraphs A 1 to A 8 as present paragraphs 1 a to 1 h, and redesignated former paragraphs B 1 to B 7 as present paragraphs 2 a to 2 g; in subdivision 1, substituted “$25” for “twenty-five dollars”; in paragraph 1 a, added “domestication, or incorporation surrender; in subdivision 2, substituted “$10” for “ten dollars”; and in subdivision 3, substituted “$5” for “five dollars.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274 added paragraph 1 i and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 771 substituted “certificate pursuant to §

13.1-945

, the fee shall be $6” for “certificate of change of name, the fee shall be $5” in subdivision 3.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 added “except as provided in §

12.1-21.2

” at the end of the introductory paragraph; deleted “or consolidation” following “merger” in subdivision 1 h; and inserted “or to renew the reservation of” in subdivision 2 a.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 130 substituted “An application for” for “A statement of” at the beginning of subdivision 2 g.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, added subdivision 1 and renumbered the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and added subdivisions 2 j and 3 h. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-817.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 123.